apertium-lin.lin.lexc
LEXICON Ia-II-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl1a%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%<n%>%<cl1a%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 2
%[%+sg%]%[%+abs%]%<n%>%<cl1a%>%<sg%>%<abs%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%[%+abs%]%<n%>%<cl1a%>%<pl%>%<abs%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 2
%[%+pl%]%[%+def%]%<n%>%<cl1a%>%<pl%>%<def%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 2

LEXICON III-IV-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl3%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%<n%>%<cl3%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 4
%[%+sg%]%[%+abs%]%<n%>%<cl3%>%<sg%>%<abs%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%[%+abs%]%<n%>%<cl3%>%<pl%>%<abs%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 4
%[%+pl%]%[%+def%]%<n%>%<cl3%>%<pl%>%<def%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 4

LEXICON V-VI-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl5%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%<n%>%<cl5%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 6
%[%+sg%]%[%+abs%]%<n%>%<cl5%>%<sg%>%<abs%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%[%+abs%]%<n%>%<cl5%>%<pl%>%<abs%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 6
%[%+pl%]%[%+def%]%<n%>%<cl5%>%<pl%>%<def%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 6

LEXICON VII-VIII-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl7%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%<n%>%<cl7%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 8
%[%+sg%]%[%+abs%]%<n%>%<cl7%>%<sg%>%<abs%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%[%+abs%]%<n%>%<cl7%>%<pl%>%<abs%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 8
%[%+pl%]%[%+def%]%<n%>%<cl7%>%<pl%>%<def%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 8

LEXICON IX-X-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl9%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%<n%>%<cl9%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 10
%[%+sg%]%[%+abs%]%<n%>%<cl9%>%<sg%>%<abs%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%[%+abs%]%<n%>%<cl9%>%<pl%>%<abs%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 10
%[%+pl%]%[%+def%]%<n%>%<cl9%>%<pl%>%<def%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 10

LEXICON XI-VI-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl11%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%<n%>%<cl11%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 6
%[%+sg%]%[%+abs%]%<n%>%<cl11%>%<sg%>%<abs%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%[%+abs%]%<n%>%<cl11%>%<pl%>%<abs%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 6
%[%+pl%]%[%+def%]%<n%>%<cl11%>%<pl%>%<def%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 6
%[%+sg%]%[%+inst%]%<n%>%<cl11%>%<sg%>%<inst%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON XIV-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl14%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+sg%]%[%+abs%]%<n%>%<cl14%>%<sg%>%<abs%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+sg%]%[%+inst%]%<n%>%<cl14%>%<sg%>%<inst%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON XV-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl15%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON N1-Suffix
%<n%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Anthroponym-F-Suffix
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Anthroponym-M-Suffix
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Toponym-Suffix
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON MiscProper-Suffix
%<np%>%<al%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

!=============================================================================!
!                         Verb Morphotactics                                  !
!=============================================================================!

LEXICON VerbPersonNum-Prefix
%[%-p1%]%[%-sg%]%[%-aa%]:na%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p2%]%[%-sg%]%[%-aa%]:o%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p3%]%[%-sg%]%[%-aa%]:a%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p3%]%[%-sg%]%[%-aa%]:ma%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p3%]%[%-sg%]%[%-aa%]:bi%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p3%]%[%-sg%]%[%-aa%]:mu%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p3%]%[%-sg%]%[%-aa%]:li%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p3%]%[%-sg%]%[%-aa%]:mo%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p1%]%[%-pl%]%[%-aa%]:to%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p2%]%[%-pl%]%[%-aa%]:bo%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p3%]%[%-pl%]%[%-aa%]:ba%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p3%]%[%-nn%]:e%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-inf%]:ko%> Verb-Stems ; ! Infinitive form goes straight to stems
%[%-imp%]: Verb-Stems ; ! Imperative goes straight to stems

LEXICON VerbFutRefOrStem
Verb-Stems ;
VerbFut-Prefix ;
VerbRef-Inf ;

LEXICON VerbFut-Prefix
%[%-fut%]:ko VerbRefOrStem ;

LEXICON VerbRefOrStem
VerbRef-Inf ;
Verb-Stems ;

LEXICON VerbRef-Inf
%[%-ref%]:mí%> Verb-Stems ;

LEXICON Verb-Suffix
Verb-Rad-Ex ;
%<vblex%>:%> Verb-TAM-Suffix ;

LEXICON Aux-Verb-Suffix
%<vaux%>: Verb-TAM-Suffix ;

LEXICON Verb-Rad-Ex
%<vblex%>%<appl%>:%>el%> Verb-Rad-Ex2 ;
%<vblex%>%<caus%>:%>is%> Verb-Rad-Ex2 ;
%<vblex%>%<recip%>:%>an%> Verb-Rad-Ex2 ;
%<vblex%>%<rev%>:%>w%> Verb-Rad-Ex2 ;
!%<vblex%>%<stat%>:%>al%> Verb-Rad-Ex2 ; ! This form is used only for 2 verbs.
%<vblex%>%<pass%>:%>am%> Verb-Rad-Ex2 ;
%<vblex%>%<caus%>%<rev%>:%>ol%> Verb-TAM-Suffix ;

LEXICON Verb-Rad-Ex2
Verb-TAM-Suffix ;
%<appl%>:el%> Verb-TAM-Suffix ;
%<caus%>:is%> Verb-TAM-Suffix ;
%<recip%>:an%> Verb-TAM-Suffix ;
%<rev%>:w%> Verb-TAM-Suffix ;
%<pass%>:am%> Verb-TAM-Suffix ;

LEXICON Verb-TAM-Suffix
Verb-Present-Suffix ;
Verb-Past-Suffix ;
Verb-URP-Suffix ;
Verb-DPRES-Suffix ;
Verb-Fut-Suffix ;
Verb-Present-Ref-Suffix ;
Verb-Past-Ref-Suffix ;
Verb-URP-Ref-Suffix ;
Verb-DPRES-Ref-Suffix ;
Verb-Fut-Ref-Suffix ;
Verb-InfImp-Suffix ;

LEXICON Verb-Irreg1-Suffix
%<vblex%>:%> Verb-TAM-Irreg1-Suffix ;

LEXICON Verb-Irreg2-Suffix
:%> Verb-TAM-Irreg2-Suffix ;

! Takes the "normal" root in the future, infinitive, and imperative
LEXICON Verb-TAM-Irreg1-Suffix
Verb-Fut-Suffix ;
Verb-Fut-Ref-Suffix ;
Verb-InfImp-Suffix ;

! Otherwise takes the irregular root
LEXICON Verb-TAM-Irreg2-Suffix
Verb-Present-Suffix ;
Verb-Past-Suffix ;
Verb-URP-Suffix ;
Verb-DPRES-Suffix ;
Verb-Present-Ref-Suffix ;
Verb-Past-Ref-Suffix ;
Verb-URP-Ref-Suffix ;
Verb-DPRES-Ref-Suffix ;

LEXICON Verb-InfImp-Suffix
%[%+inf%]%<inf%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+inf%]%<inf%>%<intns%>:áká COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+imp%]%<imp%>:a COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+imp%]%<imp%>%<intns%>:áká COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Verb-Present-Suffix
%[%+p1%]%[%+sg%]%[%+aa%]%<pres%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<aa%>:%{í%} COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p2%]%[%+sg%]%[%+aa%]%<pres%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<aa%>:%{í%} COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p3%]%[%+sg%]%[%+aa%]%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<aa%>:%{í%} COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p1%]%[%+pl%]%[%+aa%]%<pres%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<aa%>:%{í%} COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p2%]%[%+pl%]%[%+aa%]%<pres%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<aa%>:%{í%} COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p3%]%[%+pl%]%[%+aa%]%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<aa%>:%{í%} COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p3%]%[%+nn%]%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<nn%>:%{í%} COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Verb-Past-Suffix
%[%+p1%]%[%+sg%]%[%+aa%]%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<aa%>:áká COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p2%]%[%+sg%]%[%+aa%]%<past%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<aa%>:áká COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p3%]%[%+sg%]%[%+aa%]%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<aa%>:áká COMMON-Suffix ;
!%[%+p3%]%[%+sg%]%[%+aa%]%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<aa%>%<TEST%>:aka COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p1%]%[%+pl%]%[%+aa%]%<past%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<aa%>:áká COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p2%]%[%+pl%]%[%+aa%]%<past%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<aa%>:áká COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p3%]%[%+pl%]%[%+aa%]%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<aa%>:áká COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p3%]%[%+nn%]%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<nn%>:áká COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Verb-URP-Suffix
%[%+p1%]%[%+sg%]%[%+aa%]%<urp%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<aa%>:ákí COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p2%]%[%+sg%]%[%+aa%]%<urp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<aa%>:ákí COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p3%]%[%+sg%]%[%+aa%]%<urp%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<aa%>:ákí COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p1%]%[%+pl%]%[%+aa%]%<urp%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<aa%>:ákí COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p2%]%[%+pl%]%[%+aa%]%<urp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<aa%>:ákí COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p3%]%[%+pl%]%[%+aa%]%<urp%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<aa%>:ákí COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p3%]%[%+nn%]%<urp%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<nn%>:ákí COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON Verb-DPRES-Suffix
%[%+p1%]%[%+sg%]%[%+aa%]%<dpres%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<aa%>:á COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p2%]%[%+sg%]%[%+aa%]%<dpres%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<aa%>:á COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p3%]%[%+sg%]%[%+aa%]%<dpres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<aa%>:á COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p1%]%[%+pl%]%[%+aa%]%<dpres%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<aa%>:á COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p2%]%[%+pl%]%[%+aa%]%<dpres%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<aa%>:á COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p3%]%[%+pl%]%[%+aa%]%<dpres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<aa%>:á COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p3%]%[%+nn%]%<dpres%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<nn%>:á COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON III-IV-Stems
molangi:langi III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Bottle"
molímó:límó III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Spirit, soul"
mosapi:sapi III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Finger"
mobémbo:bémbo III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Trip, travel, journey"
mofuku:fuku III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Sack"
mondule:ndule III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Trumpet"
mobali:bali III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Boy, man, husband"
mokili:kili III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Earth"
mondélé:ndélé III-IV-Suffix ; ! "White man"
motámbo:támbo III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Trap"
motuna:tuna III-IV-Suffix ; ! "Question"
LEXICON V-VI-Stems
lisanola:sanola V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Comb"
litambála:tambála V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Scarf, towel, handkerchief"
litongo:tongo V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Knot"
lilála:lála V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Orange(fruit)"
lisalá:salá V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Field, garden"
likómbe:kómbe V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Bachelor, single"
libála:bála V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Marriage"
libulu:bulu V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Hole, well"
likí:kí V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Egg"
limpúlututú:limpúlututú V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Spider"
litíti:títi V-VI-Suffix ; ! "Grass'
LEXICON VII-VIII-Stems
étónga:tónga VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Flock"
elékéla:lekela VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Passage, way"
eyenga:yenga VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Sunday, holiday, festival"
etanda:tanda VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Bench"
elɛ́ngí:lɛ́ngí VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Good(taste), sweet"
etálángu:tálángu VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Scaffold"
efelo:felo VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Wall"
ekelamo:kelamo VII-VIII-Suffix ;  ! "Living being"
elambá:lambá VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Costume, dress, garment"
epái:pái VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "Place, location"
eyékwelo:yékwelo VII-VIII-Suffix ; ! "School"
LEXICON IX-X-Stems
mbelí:mbelí IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Knife"
mbótama:mbótama IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Birth"
mvúla:mvúla IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Rain, year"
mpáku:mpáku IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Tax"
mokongo:mokongo IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Back(body)"
mbólókó:mbólókó IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Antelope"
ndingisa:ndingisa IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Authorization"
ngonga:ngonga IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Bell"
nkɔ́si:nkɔ́si IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Lion"
nzémbo:nzémbo IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Song"
ngɛngɛ:ngɛngɛ IX-X-Suffix ; ! "Poison"
LEXICON ProperNouns
Abraham:Abraham Anthroponym-M-Suffix ; ! "Abraham"
Asulia:Asulia Toponym-Suffix ; ! "Assyria"
Barnabas:Barnabas Anthroponym-M-Suffix ; ! "Barnabas"
Bayuda:Bayuda MiscProper-Suffix ; ! "Judaism" (?)
Burundi:Burundi Toponym-Suffix ; ! "Burundi"
Ciluba:Ciluba MiscProper-Suffix ; ! "Ciluba"
Demokratíki:Demokratíki MiscProper-Suffix ; ! "Democratic"
Efeze:Efeze MiscProper-Suffix ; ! "Ephesians"
Elamani:Elamani Anthroponym-M-Suffix ; ! "Helaman"
Eva:Eva Anthroponym-F-Suffix ; ! "Eve"
Falansia:Falansia Toponym-Suffix ; ! "France"
Gihona:Gihona Toponym-Suffix ; ! "Gihon"
Gracia:Gracia Anthroponym-F-Suffix ; ! "Grace"
Filipe:Filipe Anthroponym-M-Suffix ; ! "Phillip"
Yozefu:Yozefu Anthroponym-M-Suffix ; ! "Joseph" Dir/LR
Kivu:Kivu Toponym-Suffix ; ! "Kivu"
Lehi:Lehi Anthroponym-F-Suffix ; ! "Lehi"
Bɛ́lɛjika:Bɛ́lɛjika Toponym-Suffix ; ! "Belgium"
Mariya:Mariya Anthroponym-F-Suffix ; ! "Mary"
Mat:Mat Anthroponym-M-Suffix ; ! "Matt"
Nzámbe:Nzámbe MiscProper-Suffix ; ! "God, Lord"
Pake:Pake MiscProper-Suffix ; ! "Passover"
Pólo:Pólo Anthroponym-M-Suffix ; ! "Paul"
Rome:Rome Toponym-Suffix ; ! "Romans"
Simon:Simon Anthroponym-M-Suffix ; ! "Simon"
Yelusaleme:Yelusaleme Toponym-Suffix ; ! "Jerusalem" (Book of Mormon)
Yézu:Yézu Anthroponym-M-Suffix ; ! "Jesus"
Zalayemila:Zalayemila MiscProper-Suffix ; ! ?
Guérin:Guérin Anthroponym-M-Suffix ; ! "Guérin"
Wenge:Wenge MiscProper-Suffix ; ! "Wenge" (Popular music in Kinshasa)
Léopoldville:Léopoldville Toponym-Suffix ; ! "Léopoldville"
Otrish:Otrish Toponym-Suffix ; ! "Austria"
Vietnami:Vietnami Toponym-Suffix ; ! "Vietnam"
Krie:Krie MiscProper-Suffix ; ! "Traditional dance"
Mvemba:Mvemba Anthroponym-M-Suffix ; ! "Chief"
LEXICON Verb-Stems
kotómbola:tómbol Verb-Suffix ; ! "To lift"
koswána:swán Verb-Suffix ; ! "To argue, wrangle"
kongánga:ngáng Verb-Suffix ; ! "To shout, exclaim"
kopúmbwa:púmbw Verb-Suffix ; ! "To fly"
kobándola:bándol Verb-Suffix ; ! "To loosen"
kotónga:tóng Verb-Suffix ; ! "To build"
koyíkinya:yíkiny Verb-Suffix ; ! "To accumulate"
kobatá:bat Verb-Suffix ; ! "To watch"
kokauka:kauk Verb-Suffix ; ! "To dry"
kolimba:limb Verb-Suffix ; ! "To reach"
koyíka:yík Verb-Suffix ; ! "Increase, multiply"
kozala:zal Aux-Verb-Suffix ;
kokoka:kok Aux-Verb-Suffix ; ! "Can, may"
kosɛngɛle:sɛngɛl Aux-Verb-Suffix ; ! "(I) must" should only be conjugated at p3
